California, session 20252026, SB249.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 1007 of the Education Code is amended to read:1007. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, commencing January 1, 2026, any election for the members of a county board of education shall be consolidated with the statewide general election. (b)If the elections for the members of the governing board of a school district and the members of the county board of education are held on the same date, then the provisions of Section 5303 shall apply to the election of members of the county board of education.(c)Elections held pursuant to this article shall be conducted by the county board of education, except as provided in subdivision (b).(d)(b) (1) County board of education members shall take office on the second Friday in December subsequent to their election. The county committee on school district organization shall determine the manner in which the county board of education first elected shall effect a staggering of terms.(2) Commencing January 1, 2026, the term of office of all incumbent members of a county board of education shall be extended accordingly for purposes of subdivision (a) and the county committee on school district organization shall determine the manner in which the county board of education shall effect a staggering of terms, if necessary.SEC. 2. Section 1009 of the Education Code is amended to read:1009. The county board of education shall organize at a meeting held in each year by electing one of their number president of the board. The meeting at which the organization is conducted shall be either the first meeting on or after the second Friday in December.SEC. 3. Section 1017 of the Education Code is repealed.SEC. 4. Section 1302 of the Elections Code is amended to read:1302. (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the regular election to select governing board members in any school or community college district shall be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of each odd-numbered year.(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as provided in Section 1302.5, after the initial election of governing board members in any school district or community college district, the election of governing board members for the district may be established, upon the adoption of an appropriate resolution by the governing board, to regularly occur on the same day as the statewide direct primary election, the statewide general election, or the general municipal election as set forth in Section 1301. The resolution shall become operative upon approval by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 10404.5 or 10405.7, as applicable. If a school district or community college district is located in more than one county, the district may not consolidate an election if any county in which the district is located denies the request for consolidation.(2) If the board of supervisors approves the resolution pursuant to Section 10404.5 or 10405.7, as applicable, the election of the governing board members of the school district or community college district shall be conducted on the date specified by the board of supervisors, in accordance with paragraph (1), unless the approval is later rescinded by the board of supervisors.(3) In the event of consolidation, the election of governing board members of the school district or community college district shall be conducted in accordance with all applicable procedural requirements of the Elections Code pertaining to that primary, general, or municipal election, and shall thereafter occur in consolidation with that election.(4) If the date of an election is changed pursuant to this section, at least one election shall be held before the resolution, as approved by the board of supervisors, may be subsequently repealed or amended.SEC. 5. Section 10404.5 of the Elections Code is amended to read:10404.5. (a) A resolution of the governing board of a school district to establish an election day pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1302 shall be adopted and submitted to the board of supervisors not later than 240 days prior to the date of the currently scheduled election of the school district.(b) The final date for the submission of the resolution by the governing board of a school district to the board of supervisors is not subject to waiver.(c) The board of supervisors shall notify all school districts located in the county of the receipt of the resolution to consolidate and shall request input from each district on the effect of consolidation.(d) (1) The board of supervisors, within 60 days from the date of submission, shall approve the resolution unless it finds that the ballot style, voting equipment, or computer capacity is such that additional elections or materials cannot be handled. Prior to the adoption of a resolution to either approve or deny a consolidation request, the board or boards of supervisors may obtain from the elections official a report on the cost-effectiveness of the proposed action.(2) Public notices of the proceedings in which the resolution is to be considered for adoption shall be made pursuant to Section 25151 of the Government Code.(e) Within 30 days after the approval of the resolution by the board of supervisors, the elections official shall notify all registered voters of the school districts affected by the consolidation of the approval of the resolution by the board of supervisors. The notice shall be delivered by mail and at the expense of the school district.(f) An election day established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1302 shall be prescribed to occur not less than one month, nor more than 12 months, subsequent to the election day prescribed in Section 5000 of the Education Code. As used in this subdivision, “12 months” means the period from the election day prescribed in Section 5000 of the Education Code to the first Tuesday after the first Monday in the 12th month subsequent to that day, inclusive.(g) In the event that the election day for a school district governing board is established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1302, the term of office of all then incumbent members of that school district governing board shall be extended accordingly.SEC. 6. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.